Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201575-908
Enforcement of act.

The commission, county and municipal law enforcement agencies, and the Attorney General shall enforce the Grain Dealer Act.

Laws 1985, LB 389, § 10;

Laws 1987, LB 507, § 7;

Laws 2015, LB183, § 5.
August 30, 2015